Utah statutes.
3-1-41.   Domestic or foreign corporations or associations -- Plan of merger
-- Articles of merger -- Certificate of merger.
(1) (a)  A Utah cooperative association owning 90% of the outstanding shares
of each class of a foreign or domestic corporation or association may merge
such other corporation or association into itself without the approval of the
shareholders or members of either corporation or association.
(b)  The governing board shall, by resolution, approve a plan of merger
setting forth:
(i)  the name of the subsidiary corporation or association and the name of the
corporation or association owning 90% or more of its shares, which is
hereafter designated as the surviving corporation or association; and
(ii)  the manner and basis for converting each class of shares of the
subsidiary corporation or association into shares, obligations, or other
securities of the surviving corporation or association, or of any other
corporation or association, in whole or in part, into cash or other property.
(c)  A copy of the plan of merger shall be mailed to each record member or
shareholder of the subsidiary corporation or association.
(2) (a)  Articles of merger shall be executed in triplicate by the president
or vice president and the secretary or an assistant secretary of the surviving
corporation or association and verified by one of its officers.
(b)  The articles of merger shall set forth:
(i)  the plan of merger;
(ii)  the number of outstanding shares of each class of the subsidiary
corporation or association and the number of such shares of each class owned
by the surviving corporation or association; and
(iii)  the date a copy of the plan of merger was mailed to shareholders or
members of the subsidiary corporation or association.
(3) (a)  Triplicate originals of the articles of merger shall be delivered to
the Division of Corporations and Commercial Code on the 30th day after mailing
a copy of the plan to shareholders or members.
(b)  If that division finds such articles conform to law and that all fees
prescribed by this act have been paid, it shall:
(i)  endorse on each of said triplicate originals the word "filed," together
with the month, date, and year of filing;
(ii)  file one of the triplicate originals with the Division of Corporations
and Commercial Code and forward another triplicate original to the state
Department of Agriculture and Food; and
(iii)  issue a certificate of merger with the remaining triplicate original
affixed.
(c)  The certificate of merger, together with a triplicate original of the
articles of merger affixed by the Division of Corporations and Commercial
Code, shall be returned to the surviving corporation or association or its
representative.
(4)  The merger of a foreign corporation or association into a Utah
cooperative association shall conform to the laws of the state under which
each such foreign corporation or association is organized.
